New Jersey, session 222, S331.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, each owner in the business of renting motor vehicles pursuant to R.S.45:21-12 shall provide a method to allow a person to return a vehicle 24 hours per day. b.    An owner that violates the provisions of subsection a. of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $2,500 for a first offense and up to a $5,000 for any subsequent offense, which may be collected and enforced by the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety in a summary proceeding pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  The Superior Court shall have jurisdiction of proceedings for the enforcement of the penalty provided by this section. c.    The Director of Consumer Affairs may, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment, except the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs may take any administrative action in advance of the effective date as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act.